District of Columbia statutes.
3-2302.08

Repealed

Qualifications of applicant; examinations; issuance of license without examination; fee; closed applications; reopening

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(f), 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., §§ 2-1702.1 to 2-1702.19.